Montana, session 2025, SB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Limitation on contributions from certain tax-exempt organizations.
An organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
501(c)(4), may not make a contribution exceeding $2,500 to a political committee or joint fundraising committee
for the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate or ballot issue.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Prohibited contributions from tax-exempt entities. (1) (a) An
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 529

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 529.1
organization exempt from taxation under section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 501, may not
make a contribution to a candidate directly or through an intermediary.
(b) A candidate may not accept or receive a contribution as provided in subsection (1)(a).
(2) An organization exempt from taxation under section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26
U.S.C. 501, may not make a contribution to a political committee or joint fundraising committee if the
organization received a donation or contribution, as defined in 13-1-101, from a foreign national, as defined in
13-37-501, directly or through an intermediary, in the preceding 4 years.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Penalties. A person who violates [section 1 or 2] is liable in a civil action
pursuant to 13-37-128.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be
codified as a new part in Title 13, chapter 37, and the provisions of Title 13, chapter 37, apply to [sections 1
through 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured,
penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 529